Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202528-1905
Offense under foreign law; acts prohibited; violation; penalty.

(1) A person commits an offense if, while acting as the agent of a foreign principal, such person:

(a) Intentionally engages in the prevention, detection, investigation, monitoring, surveilling, or prosecution of an offense under the law or rule of a government of a foreign country or a foreign terrorist organization at the direction of such foreign principal, government, or organization; and

(b) Such person acts without the knowledge and approval of the appropriate state or federal law enforcement agency of the United States.

(2) A violation of this section is a Class IIA felony.

Laws 2025, LB644, § 18.